Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 48.14.020 and 2023 c 388 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Subject to other provisions of this chapter, each authorized insurer except title insurers and registered eligible captive insurers as defined in RCW 48.201.020 shall on or before the first day of March of each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office a tax on premiums. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, such tax shall be in the amount of ((two))2.75 percent of all premiums collected during calendar year 2026, and in the amount of 2.0 percent of all premiums collected during calendar year 2027 and thereafter, excluding amounts returned to or the amount of reductions in premiums allowed to holders of industrial life policies for payment of premiums directly to an office of the insurer, collected or received by the insurer under RCW 48.14.090 during the preceding calendar year other than ocean marine and foreign trade insurances, after deducting premiums paid to policyholders as returned premiums, upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be performed in this state. For tax purposes, the reporting of premiums shall be on a written basis or on a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required by the annual statement. For the purposes of this section the consideration received by an insurer for the granting of an annuity shall not be deemed to be a premium.(b) Beginning July 1, 2023, and July 1st of each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall deposit $7,000,000 in moneys collected for premium taxes pursuant to this section into the Washington auto theft prevention authority account created in RCW 46.66.080. Beginning July 1, 2023, the amount deposited under this subsection must be adjusted by the most current seasonally adjusted index of the consumer price index for all urban consumers as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.(2)(a) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to amounts received by any life and disability insurer for health care services included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW 18.32.020 except amounts received for pediatric oral services that qualify as coverage for the minimum essential coverage requirement under P.L. 111-148 (2010), as amended, and for stand-alone family dental plans as defined in RCW 43.71.080(4)(a), only when offered in the individual market, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, or to a small group, as defined in RCW 48.43.005.(b) ((Beginning))Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, beginning January 1, 2014, moneys collected for premiums written on qualified health benefit plans and qualified dental plans offered through the health benefit exchange under chapter 43.71 RCW must be deposited in the health benefit exchange account under RCW 43.71.060.(3) In the case of insurers which require the payment by their policyholders at the inception of their policies of the entire premium thereon in the form of premiums or premium deposits which are the same in amount, based on the character of the risks, regardless of the length of term for which such policies are written, such tax shall be in the amount of ((two))2.75 percent of the gross amount of such premiums and premium deposits collected during calendar year 2026, and in the amount of 2.0 percent of the gross amount of such premiums and premium deposits collected during calendar year 2027 and thereafter, upon policies on risks resident, located, or to be performed in this state, in force as of the ((thirty-first))31st day of December next preceding, less the unused or unabsorbed portion of such premiums and premium deposits computed at the average rate thereof actually paid or credited to policyholders or applied in part payment of any renewal premiums or premium deposits on one-year policies expiring during such year.(4) Each authorized insurer shall with respect to all ocean marine and foreign trade insurance contracts written within this state during the preceding calendar year, on or before the first day of March of each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office a tax of ninety-five one-hundredths of one percent on its gross underwriting profit. Such gross underwriting profit shall be ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e., gross premiums less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on such ocean marine and foreign trade insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e., gross losses paid less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded) during such calendar year under such contracts. In the case of insurers issuing participating contracts, such gross underwriting profit shall not include, for computation of the tax prescribed by this subsection, the amounts refunded, or paid as participation dividends, by such insurers to the holders of such contracts.(5) The state does hereby preempt the field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon insurers or their appointed insurance producers, other than title insurers, and no county, city, town or other municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose any such taxes upon such insurers or these insurance producers.(6) If an authorized insurer collects or receives any such premiums on account of policies in force in this state which were originally issued by another insurer and which other insurer is not authorized to transact insurance in this state on its own account, such collecting insurer shall be liable for and shall pay the tax on such premiums.(7) The portion of taxes imposed under subsections (1) and (3) of this section that exceed two percent of premiums shall be deposited in the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130 and used to fund the premium assistance and cost-sharing reduction program established in RCW 43.71.110.(8) The portion of taxes imposed under subsection (1) or (3) of this section that exceed two percent of premiums must be borne solely by the taxpayer and may not be passed through to enrollees in premiums, rates, plan design, or otherwise, unless the commissioner determines that to do so would create a significant risk of carrier insolvency or consumer harm. A taxpayer shall demonstrate the taxpayer's compliance with this subsection as directed by the commissioner. The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this subsection.Sec. 2. RCW 48.14.0201 and 2025 c 423 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010.(2) ((Each))(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each taxpayer must pay a tax on or before the first day of March of each year to the state treasurer through the insurance commissioner's office. The tax must be equal to the total amount of all premiums and prepayments for health care services collected or received by the taxpayer under RCW 48.14.090 during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of two percent. For tax purposes, the reporting of premiums and prepayments must be on a written basis or on a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required by the annual statement.(b) For all premiums and prepayments collected during calendar year 2026, the tax must be equal to the total amount of all premiums and prepayments for health care services collected or received by the taxpayer under RCW 48.14.090 during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of 2.75 percent.(3) Taxpayers must prepay their tax obligations under this section. The minimum amount of the prepayments is the percentages of the taxpayer's tax obligation for the preceding calendar year recomputed using the rate in effect for the current year. For the prepayment of taxes due during the first calendar year, the minimum amount of the prepayments is the percentages of the taxpayer's tax obligation that would have been due had the tax been in effect during the previous calendar year. The tax prepayments must be paid to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office by the due dates and in the following amounts:(a) On or before June 15, 45 percent;(b) On or before September 15, 25 percent;(c) On or before December 15, 25 percent.(4) For good cause demonstrated in writing, the commissioner may approve an amount smaller than the preceding calendar year's tax obligation as recomputed for calculating the health maintenance organization's, health care service contractor's, self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement's, or certified health plan's prepayment obligations for the current tax year.(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, moneys collected under this section are deposited in the general fund.(b) Beginning January 1, 2014, moneys collected from taxpayers for premiums written on qualified health benefit plans and qualified dental plans offered through the health benefit exchange under chapter 43.71 RCW must be deposited in the health benefit exchange account under RCW 43.71.060, except as provided in (c) of this subsection.(c) The portion of taxes collected under subsection (2)(b) of this section for calendar year 2026 that exceed two percent of premiums and prepayments, must be deposited in the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130 and used to fund the premium assistance and cost-sharing reduction program established in RCW 43.71.110.(6) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to:(a) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the United States or any instrumentality thereof as prepayments for health care services provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the federal social security act.(b) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the state of Washington as prepayments for health care services provided under:(i) The medical care services program as provided in RCW 74.09.035; or(ii) The Washington basic health plan on behalf of subsidized enrollees as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW.(c) Amounts received by any health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or any health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, as prepayments for health care services included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW 18.32.020, except amounts received for pediatric oral services that qualify as coverage for the minimum essential coverage requirement under P.L. 111-148 (2010), as amended, and for stand-alone family dental plans as defined in RCW 43.71.080(4)(a), only when offered in the individual market, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, or to a small group, as defined in RCW 48.43.005.(d) Participant contributions to self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements that are not taxable in this state.(7) Beginning January 1, 2000, the state preempts the field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon taxpayers and no county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision has the right to impose any such taxes upon such taxpayers. This subsection is limited to premiums and payments for health benefit plans offered by health care service contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW, health maintenance organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW, and self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010. The preemption authorized by this subsection must not impair the ability of a county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision to impose excise or privilege taxes upon the health care services directly delivered by the employees of a health maintenance organization under chapter 48.46 RCW.(8)(a) The taxes imposed by this section apply to a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement only in the event that they are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the commissioner must initially request an advisory opinion from the United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from a federal court on the legality of imposing state premium taxes on these arrangements. Once the legality of the taxes has been determined, the multiple employer welfare arrangement certified by the insurance commissioner must begin payment of these taxes.(b) If there has not been a final determination of the legality of these taxes, then beginning on the earlier of (i) the date the fourth multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the insurance commissioner, or (ii) April 1, 2006, the arrangement must deposit the taxes imposed by this section into an interest bearing escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final determination that the taxes are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account must be transferred to the state treasurer.(9) The effect of transferring contracts for health care services from one taxpayer to another taxpayer is to transfer the tax prepayment obligation with respect to the contracts.(10) On or before June 1st of each year, the commissioner must notify each taxpayer required to make prepayments in that year of the amount of each prepayment and must provide remittance forms to be used by the taxpayer. However, a taxpayer's responsibility to make prepayments is not affected by failure of the commissioner to send, or the taxpayer to receive, the notice or forms.(11) The portion of taxes imposed under subsection (2)(b) of this section that exceed two percent of premiums and prepayments must be borne solely by the taxpayer and may not be passed through to enrollees in premiums, rates, plan design, or otherwise, unless the commissioner determines that to do so would create a significant risk of carrier insolvency or consumer harm. A taxpayer shall demonstrate the taxpayer's compliance with this subsection as directed by the commissioner. The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this subsection.--- END ---